Massachusetts, session 194th, H1950.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
The fourth paragraph of section 3-1201 of part 12 of article III of chapter 190B of the
General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out the
first sentence and inserting in place thereof the following 2 sentences:-

Upon the presentation of a copy of such a statement duly attested by the register,
the tender of a proper receipt in writing and the surrender of any policy, passbook, note,
certificate or other evidentiary instrument, a voluntary personal representative may, as the legal
representative of the deceased and his estate: (i) receive payment of any debt or obligation in the
nature of a debt, (ii) receive delivery of any chattel or asset scheduled in such statement or (iii)
open a bank account for the estate of the decedent. A bank shall accept a copy of such a
of 2

statement duly attested by the register as acceptable documentation to open a bank account for
the estate of the decedent and the appointment of the voluntary personal representative as the
personal representative to the bank account.
of 2